Utah statutes.
63B-1-304.   State Building Ownership Authority created -- Members -- Compensation -- Location in Department of Administrative Services.

(1)  There is created a body politic and corporate to be known as the State Building Ownership Authority composed of:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  the state treasurer; and

(c)  the chair of the State Building Board created under Section 63A-5-101.

(2)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(3) (a)  Upon request, the division shall provide staff support to the State Building Ownership Authority.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority may seek and obtain independent financial advice, support, and information from the state financial advisor created under Section 67-4-16.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

